Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3568.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 124D.901, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given: (1) "new position" means a student support services personnel full-time or part-time position not under contract by a school district, charter school, or cooperative unit at the start of the 2022-2023 school year; (2) "part-time position" means a student support services personnel position less than 1.0 full-time equivalent at the start of the 2022-2023 school year; and (3) "student support services personnel" meansnew text begin :new text end new text begin (i)new text end an individual licensed to serve as a school counselor, school psychologist, school social worker, school nurse, or chemical dependency counselor in Minnesotadeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (ii) a special education teacher licensed in Minnesota as an academic and behavioral strategist, or in developmental disabilities, emotional or behavioral disorders, learning disabilities, or autism spectrum disorders. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for revenue in fiscal year 2027 and later. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 124D.901, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Allowed uses. (a) Aid under this section must be used to enhance student support services by: (1) increasing new student support services personnel positions; (2) increasing a current student support services personnel position that is less than 1.0 full-time equivalent to a greater number of service hours; or (3) making permanent a student support services personnel position hired using onetime resources. (b) Cooperative student support personnel aid must be transferred to the intermediate district or other cooperative unit of which the district is a member and used to hire new positions for student support services personnel or increase a current position that is less than 1.0 full-time equivalent to a greater number of service hours or make permanent a position hired using onetime resources at the intermediate district or cooperative unit. (c) If a school district, charter school, or cooperative unit does not receive at least two applications and is not able to hire a new full-time equivalent position with student support personnel aid or use the aid as otherwise provided under subdivision 4a, the aid may be used for contracted services from deleted text begin individualsdeleted text end licensed deleted text begin to serve as a school counselor, school psychologist, school social worker, school nurse, or chemical dependency counselor in Minnesotadeleted text end new text begin individuals serving as student support services personnelnew text end . (d) In addition to the personnel uses authorized under paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) and subdivision 4a, a district, charter school, or cooperative unit may use up to $5,000 of student support personnel aid each year for the following purposes: (1) to cover the costs of providing training or job-embedded coaching; or (2) to cover the costs of student support personnel travel among school sites operated by a single district, charter school, or cooperative unit, or among school sites operated by a cooperative unit's member districts or a group of charter schools. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for revenue in fiscal year 2027 and later. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 124D.901, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Accounting. new text end new text begin Costs paid by student support personnel aid under this section must not be included in the calculation of special education expenditures under section 125A.76. The commissioner may establish procedures to ensure that any costs reimbursed under this section are excluded from other school revenue calculations. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for revenue in fiscal year 2027 and later. new text end